Virginia statutes. Title 60.2. Unemployment Compensation.
Article 4. Computation of Tax Rate.
§ 60.2-535.
Employing unit acquiring business, etc., of another employing unit.

Except as provided in subsection B, whenever any employing unit in any manner succeeds to or acquires the organization, trade, separate establishment or business, or substantially all the assets thereof, of another which at the time of such acquisition was an employer subject to this title, the succeeding or acquiring unit shall be assigned the experience record of the predecessor. Such record shall be deemed the experience record of the successor solely for rate computation purposes as of July 1 of the year in which the acquisition occurred. Such successor, unless already an employer subject to this title, shall, during the remainder of the current calendar year, be subject to the rate of taxation of the predecessor. If such successor is at the time of the acquisition an employer subject to this title, such successor’s rate of tax to which it is then subject shall remain the same until the next determination of rates under this chapter for all employers. When a successor acquires an employing unit by partial acquisition, the predecessor employer shall provide within thirty days of notification by the Commission, information relating to the division of taxable payroll for partial acquisitions. Such information shall be provided on a form supplied by the Commission.

Upon written notification to the Commission that it does not desire the experience record of its predecessor, a succeeding or acquiring unit shall not be assigned such record. This notification shall be made to the Commission within sixty days of the later of (i) such acquisition or succession or (ii) the effective date of this section on a form approved by the Commission. Upon receipt thereof, the Commission shall assign the notifying unit the rate of a new employer. If the notification is not received within such sixty-day period, however, the Commission shall assign the succeeding or acquiring unit the experience record of its predecessor. The provisions of this subsection shall not be applicable to any successor that, at the time of the acquisition, was an employer subject to this title.

History.

1979, c. 634, § 60.1-88.01; 1983, c. 13; 1986, c. 480; 1995, c. 515; 1997, c. 409.

§ 60.2-536.
Review of decision under § 60.2-535.

Any person aggrieved by a decision of the Commission under the provisions of §

60.2-535

shall have the right to review before the Commission. Such review before the Commission shall be instituted by a request filed by the aggrieved party with the Commission within thirty days from the date of mailing of the decision.

Any party aggrieved by the Commission decision on review may secure judicial review of any decision pursuant to the provisions of §

60.2-500

, such provisions applying mutatis mutandis.

History.

1974, c. 198, § 60.1-88.1; 1981, c. 252; 1986, c. 480; 1999, c. 79.

§ 60.2-536.1.
Transfers for the purpose of obtaining a lower unemployment compensation tax rate; assignment of rates.

If an employer shall transfer any trade or business to another employer where, at the time of transfer, there is substantially common ownership, management, or control of the trade or business, then the unemployment experience attributable to the transferred business shall also be transferred to, and combined with the unemployment experience attributable to, the employer to whom such business is transferred. If the sole or primary purpose of such transfer is to obtain a lower unemployment tax rate, that employer shall be subject to the penalties established by §

60.2-536.3

.

If an employer shall transfer any trade or business to a person who is not otherwise an employer at the time of such transfer, and the sole or primary purpose of such transfer is to obtain a lower unemployment tax rate:

The unemployment experience of the acquired business shall not be transferred to such person; instead, such person shall be assigned the higher of the transferred business’ calculated rate or the new employer rate under §

60.2-526

; and

Such person shall be subject to the penalties established by §

60.2-536.3

.

Any person who shall knowingly advise another person to engage in a transfer of any trade or business, where the sole or primary purpose of such transfer is to obtain a lower unemployment tax rate, shall be subject to the penalties established by §

60.2-536.3

.

The Commission shall establish methods to identify and investigate the transfer or acquisition of a business for purposes of this section.

For the purposes of determining whether there is “substantially common ownership, management, or control of two or more employers,” the Commission shall consider all relevant facts and circumstances, including the extent of commonality or similarity of: (i) ownership, (ii) any familial relationships, (iii) principals or corporate officers, (iv) organizational structure, (v) day-to-day operations, (vi) assets and liabilities, and (vii) stated business purpose.

For the purposes of determining whether a business was transferred solely or primarily to obtain a lower unemployment tax rate, the Commission shall consider the facts and circumstances of the transfer, including: (i) the cost of acquiring the business, (ii) how long such business was continued, and (iii) whether a substantial number of new employees was hired to perform duties unrelated to the business activity conducted prior to the transfer.

History.

2005, cc. 47, 91.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 47 and 91, cl. 4 provides: “That for the purposes of this act the term ‘rate year’ shall mean the 12 consecutive calendar month period ending June 30 for which the employer’s benefit charges are divided by the total of his payroll for the same period to determine his benefit ratio for the succeeding calendar year; however, nothing contained herein shall prohibit the Commission from applying tax rates on a calendar year basis.”

Acts 2005, cc. 47 and 91, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of §§

60.2-536.1

and

60.2-536.3

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in the first rate year as set forth in P.L. 108-295 Section 2 (c).” Set out as effective January 1, 2007, at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Law Review.

For annual survey of Virginia labor and employment law, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2005).

§ 60.2-536.2.
Advisory opinion by the Commission.

Upon application by an employer who is a party to a transfer or potential transfer of any trade or business, the Commission shall issue an advisory opinion as to whether such transfer constitutes a transfer pursuant to §

60.2-536.1

, or is solely or primarily for the purpose of obtaining a lower unemployment tax rate. The application shall be under oath or affirmation, in a form prescribed by the Commission, and shall fully set forth all relevant facts regarding the proposed transfer. The Commission may require such additional information and documentary evidence as deemed necessary for a fair and informed opinion. Such opinion shall be issued within 60 days after the Commission has received all of the information and evidence requested. An employer who proceeds with the transfer of a trade or business in reliance upon a favorable advisory opinion issued under this section shall not subsequently be found to have violated the provisions of §

18.2-204.3

, and shall not be subject to the penalties of §

60.2-536.3

, provided such employer has made full disclosure of all relevant facts to the Commission. If an employer disagrees with the Commission’s advisory opinion, it shall have the right to a hearing and decision pursuant to §

60.2-500

, provided that an application for a hearing is filed with the Commission within 30 days from the date the advisory opinion was mailed.

History.

2005, cc. 47, 91.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 47 and 91, cl. 2 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [March 20, 2005].”

§ 60.2-536.3.
Violations; penalties.

If a person knowingly transfers, or attempts to transfer, any trade or business where the sole or primary purpose is to obtain a lower unemployment tax rate, or if a person knowingly advises another person to engage, or attempt to engage, in such transfer, such person shall be subject, in addition to the criminal penalties set forth in §

18.2-204.3

, to the following additional rate of contributions and civil penalty:

If the person is an employer, he shall be assigned the highest rate assignable under this chapter for the calendar year during which such violation or attempted violation occurred, and for the next calendar year immediately following such year. However, if the employer is already at such highest rate for that year, or if the amount of increase in the employer’s rate would be less than two percent for any such year, then an additional rate of contributions of two percent of taxable wages shall be imposed for such year, which shall be paid into the benefit account of the Unemployment Compensation Fund pursuant to §

60.2-301

.

If the person is not an employer, he shall be subject to a civil penalty of $5,000, which shall be paid into the Special Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund pursuant to §

60.2-314

.

Final orders of the Commission with respect to the provisions of §

60.2-536.1

may be recorded, enforced, and satisfied as orders or decrees of a circuit court upon certification of such orders by the Clerk of the Commission. Such orders may be appealed pursuant to §

60.2-500

.

History.

2005, cc. 47, 91.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 47 and 91, cl. 4 provides: “That for the purposes of this act the term ‘rate year’ shall mean the 12 consecutive calendar month period ending June 30 for which the employer’s benefit charges are divided by the total of his payroll for the same period to determine his benefit ratio for the succeeding calendar year; however, nothing contained herein shall prohibit the Commission from applying tax rates on a calendar year basis.”

Acts 2005, cc. 47 and 91, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of §§

60.2-536.1

and

60.2-536.3

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in the first rate year as set forth in P.L. 108-295 Section 2 (c).” Set out as effective January 1, 2007, at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 60.2-536.4.
Interpretation.

The provisions of §§

60.2-536.1

through

60.2-536.3

shall be interpreted and applied in such a manner as to meet the requirements contained in Public Law 108-295.

History.

2005, cc. 47, 91.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 47 and 91, cl. 2 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [March 20, 2005].”

§ 60.2-536.5.
Definitions.

As used in §§

60.2-536.1

through

60.2-536.3

, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Knowingly”
means having actual knowledge of or acting with deliberate ignorance or reckless disregard for the prohibition involved.

“Person”
shall have the meaning given such term by § 7701 (a) (1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

“Trade”
or

“business”

includes the employer’s workforce.

“Violates”
or

“attempts”

to violate includes intent to evade, misrepresentation, or willful nondisclosure.

History.

2005, cc. 47, 91.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 47 and 91, cl. 2 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [March 20, 2005].”

§ 60.2-537.
Reduced tax rate permissible under federal amendment.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

60.2-500

through

60.2-536

, if § 3303 of the Internal Revenue Code is amended so as to allow an additional credit under § 3302 (b) of the Internal Revenue Code to employers not otherwise eligible for a reduced rate by reason of the lapse of insufficient time since first becoming subject to this title, the Commission, by a regulation promulgated under §

60.2-111

, shall fix and determine the tax rate of all such employers at such reduced rate as shall then be permissible under such federal amendment.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-76.1; 1956, c. 440; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-90; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-538.
Where employer’s taxes are delinquent.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

60.2-500

through

60.2-537

, if on July 31 of any year the taxes or any portion thereof or the interest due thereon for any previous quarter is delinquent and unpaid and has been delinquent and unpaid for ninety days or more, the Commission may issue a notice of delinquency demanding payment. If the amount due is not paid within thirty days after such notice is mailed to the delinquent employer at his last known address, such delinquent employer’s rate for the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which such notice is sent shall not be computed under the provisions of this article, but shall be 6.2 percent.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-76.2; 1956, c. 440; 1960, c. 136; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-91; 1977, c. 445; 1980, c. 480; 1981, c. 606; 1982, c. 363; 1986, c. 480.